California, session 20252026, SB1098.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) California faces an affordability crisis in energy utility rates that has been exacerbated by a shift away from forecast-based ratemaking through the general rate case process and toward retrospective recovery of recorded costs through memorandum and balancing accounts. rates.(b) The general rate case process, under which the Public Utilities Commission adopts forward-looking forecasts and ties cost recovery to utility management performance within those forecasts, provides essential incentives for cost containment and efficiency.(c) Memorandum and balancing accounts are utility ratemaking mechanisms that provide an opportunity for a utility to seek recovery of incurred costs beyond amounts previously authorized by the Public Utilities Commission.(d) The expansion of memorandum accounts and balancing accounts, particularly following the enactment of Senate Bill 901 of the 2017–2018 Regular Session (Chapter 626 of the Statutes of 2018), has enabled utilities to recover tens of billions of dollars in expenditures above authorized forecasts, reducing the incentive to control costs and contributing to rate increases. outside the general rate case process.(e) Senate Bill 254 of the 2025–2026 Regular Session (Chapter 119 of the Statutes of 2025) gave the Public Utilities Commission the discretion to permit electrical utilities to establish memorandum accounts to record incremental and unforeseen wildfire mitigation costs not authorized in their general rate cases, whereas the establishment of those memorandum accounts previously had been mandatory.(f)Restoring forecast-based ratemaking and limiting reliance on memorandum accounts and balancing accounts will better align utility incentives with affordability and ratepayer protection.SEC. 2. Section 457 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:457. (a) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:(1) “Balancing account” means a utility regulatory accounting mechanism that tracks specific costs incurred by a utility for comparison to the level of authorized costs and may provide an opportunity for the utility to seek recovery of costs above authorized amounts. amounts or for ratepayers to receive credits for costs below authorized amounts.(2) “Memorandum account” means a utility regulatory accounting mechanism that tracks specific unanticipated costs incurred by a utility that have not been authorized by the commission and provides an opportunity for the utility to seek recovery of tracked costs.(b) It is the policy of the State of California that forecast-based ratemaking through the regularly scheduled general rate case process is the preferred and primary method of establishing authorized revenue requirements for electrical corporations and gas corporations because it promotes greater oversight, transparency, and protection for ratepayers.(c) In exercising its ratemaking authority, the commission shall adhere to the following principles and requirements:(1) Forecast-based ratemaking shall be the default approach for establishing revenue requirements and cost recovery mechanisms.(2) A memorandum account or balancing account shall be authorized and maintained only under exceptional circumstances. when necessary to address costs that cannot reasonably be forecasted in the general rate case process. The commission shall make a written finding explaining why such an account is necessary and why the relevant costs cannot be adequately forecasted.(3) If a memorandum account or balancing account is authorized for a specific activity or program, the activity or program shall be transitioned to forecast-based ratemaking at the earliest opportunity once sufficient historical data exists to support forecast-based ratemaking.(4) If When the commission authorizes decides to authorize the creation or continuation of a memorandum account or balancing account, the commission shall do one of the following: shall, at the same time, consider taking the following actions:(A) Pursuant to existing commission authority, adopt adopting cost-sharing mechanisms for costs recovered through the memorandum account, and costs above authorized amounts recovered through the balancing account, as applicable.(B) Adopt Adopting a rate of return that is lower than the utility’s authorized rate of return on capital costs recovered through the memorandum account, and on capital costs above authorized amounts recovered through the balancing account, as applicable, to encourage the utility to rely less on the account and more on forecast-based ratemaking.(C) Assigning an expiration date to the memorandum account or balancing account.(d) Each memorandum account or balancing account authorized by statute or by the commission shall include a specified expiration date. commission before January 1, 2027, shall be included and reviewed in the subsequent general rate case proceeding. During its review, the commission shall consider assigning an expiration date to each memorandum account or balancing account.(e) The commission may establish exceptions to the principles and requirements of subdivision (c) for categories of costs not reviewed in a general rate case, such as pursuant to subdivision (d), including, but not limited to, low-income rate discounts, or if the explicit purpose of the balancing account or memorandum account is to reduce the utility’s incentive to disconnect customers for nonpayment.(f) This section does not limit the commission’s authority to ensure just and reasonable rates pursuant to Section 451 or to implement a memorandum account or balancing account expressly required by statute.(g) The ratemaking treatment of a memorandum account or balancing account that is in effect on January 1, 2027, shall remain unchanged until the commission reviews the memorandum account or balancing account pursuant to subdivision (d).SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.